Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 2

General Audit Provisions

9-3-201. Purpose and scope of audit.

An audit shall be made:

For purpose of ascertaining errors, irregularities, or defaults, if any, in the offices of any county officials handling and disbursing public funds;

For purpose of checking all cost bills to see that all proper items of cost, both county and state, have been duly charged, taxed and reported by the clerks of the courts in all civil, criminal, and chancery cases; and

To examine and check the accounts of the county superintendents of public instruction for the purpose of ascertaining that the school funds of the state are being expended according to the laws of the state, and for the maintenance and extension of terms of schools in the counties as provided and contemplated by the laws of the state.

The auditors shall have the authority and jurisdiction to audit the books and records of any judge of the court of general sessions when directed to do so by the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1923, ch. 109, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 948a10; Code 1932, § 1654; Acts 1935, ch. 96, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1654 (Williams, §§ 1654, 1661.1); impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 9-302, 9-3-101; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1 was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1985.

Former part 2 was transferred to part 3 of this chapter in 1985.

Cross-References. Annual audit, §4-3-304.

9-3-202. Investigation of delinquent taxes.

In making such audit, the auditors shall also investigate and ascertain what inheritance and succession taxes and privilege and ad valorem taxes are delinquent and unpaid in any of the counties, and to ascertain the correct and proper amount of such inheritance and succession taxes and privilege and ad valorem taxes that have not been paid.

Acts 1923, ch. 109, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 948a11; Code 1932, § 1655; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1655; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 9-303, 9-3-102; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8.

9-3-203. Improperly assessed personal property.

Such auditors shall have the authority to:

Ascertain any unassessed personal property or personal property assessed on a wrong or improper basis, or where such assessment on personal property was obtained by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation or concealment, but only for the current year for which such audit is made; and

Report the same to the comptroller of the treasury, whose duty it is to direct the trustee of the county in which such property is located to enter the same on the tax books of such county and the same to be the assessment in such county wherein is such personal property, and to be collected in the same way and manner as other property assessed for taxation.

Acts 1923, ch. 109, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 948a12; Code 1932, § 1656; Acts 1945, ch. 36, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1656; Acts 1977, ch. 103, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 9-304, 9-3-103; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8.

9-3-204. Filing of report — Further duties.

Within a reasonable time after the completion of any such audit in any county, one (1) copy of such audit shall be filed with the county trustee of such county and one (1) with the county mayor. These auditors shall undertake and discharge such further duties as the comptroller of the treasury may from time to time require of them.

Acts 1923, ch. 109, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 948a10; Code 1932, § 1654; Acts 1933, ch. 74, § 5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1654; Acts 1977, ch. 103, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 9-305, 9-3-104; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

9-3-205. Audit of county highway commissions.

The state and county auditors referred to by this part are required to audit the books and records of county highway commissions whenever they make an audit of other offices in the several counties of this state, but this does not apply to counties which have an auditing department or may hereafter have such department.

Such report setting forth the result of their audit of the county highway commissions shall be filed with the county mayor within a reasonable time after the same has been completed and is subject to public inspection as other public records.

Acts 1945, ch. 159, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1661.1 (Williams, § 1661.2); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 9-306, 9-3-105; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

9-3-206. Access to records.

These auditors shall have access to all books, records and accounts, including the official bank accounts of any such officials, for the purpose of making their audits and their reports.

Acts 1923, ch. 109, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 948a14; Code 1932, § 1658; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 9-307, 9-3-106; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8.

9-3-207. Summons of witnesses — Documents furnished — Bond of auditors.

These auditors shall also have the right to summon and examine witnesses and to administer the oaths to such witnesses in making any investigation of the records and reports of any such county officials; and also for the purpose of ascertaining and determining and reporting the amount of delinquent or unpaid or unassessed privilege and ad valorem taxes and inheritance and succession taxes.

The comptroller of the treasury and commissioner of revenue shall furnish these auditors with such reports, documents, data, or other information, as will facilitate their investigation.

Acts 1923, ch. 109, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 948a15; Code 1932, § 1659; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1977, ch. 103, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 9-308, 9-3-107; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8.

9-3-208. Report and collection of delinquencies.

These auditors are authorized to collect any amounts that their audits may show to be due and owing to the state and county from any such county official; and also to collect any delinquent or unpaid inheritance and succession taxes and privilege and ad valorem taxes that may be due and owing to the county and state, and to report the same to the county mayor for the portion of the same due to the county, and they shall report to the comptroller of the treasury the portion of the same due to the state; provided, that the same can be collected by the auditors without suit.

But in the event the auditors cannot collect the sums without suit, they shall report the same to the county mayor and to the comptroller of the treasury, and it shall be the duty of the county mayor to have the county attorney of such county, if there be a county attorney elected, and if not, then an attorney of such county mayor's selection residing in the county, to institute suit or suits for the collection of these sums so reported by these auditors within ninety (90) days from the date of receiving such report; provided, that the same has not been barred by the statute of limitation; and provided further, that if it is in the matter of inheritance or succession taxes, that the full time for making payment of same has expired, or, if pending on exception, when disposition is made of such exception. In the event the county mayor fails or refuses to have such suits instituted as herein provided, within ninety (90) days after receiving such report, the comptroller of the treasury may appoint an attorney to institute and prosecute a suit or suits for the benefit of the state and county.

Acts 1923, ch. 109, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 948a13; Code 1932, § 1657; Acts 1945, ch. 36, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1657; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 9-309, 9-3-108; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Officers, § 46.

9-3-209. Attorney's fees for collection of delinquencies.

When suits are instituted by the county mayor or by the comptroller of the treasury as herein provided, the fee to be allowed and paid the attorney for such attorney's services shall be fixed by the county mayor where the suit is instituted by direction of the county mayor, but the same shall be approved by the comptroller of the treasury; and, where suits are instituted by direction of the comptroller of the treasury upon the failure of the county mayor, such attorney's fees shall be fixed by the comptroller of the treasury, with the approval of the governor.

No attorney's fees shall accrue against the state or county unless they are collected by the attorney from penalties of delinquents.

Acts 1923, ch. 109, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 948a17; Code 1932, § 1661; Acts 1945, ch. 36, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1661; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 9-310, 9-3-109; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

9-3-210. County contributions to expenses of audit.

For the purpose of contributing to the expenses and compensation of the auditors, each county shall pay into the office of the comptroller of the treasury, on or before June 30 of each year, the same to be paid into the state treasury by the comptroller of the treasury, an amount to be determined on the basis of thirty-six cents (36¢) for each person in the county as shown by the population of the county under the last or any future federal census.

Beginning July 1, 2017, and using that year as a base, the foregoing thirty-six cents (36¢) shall be annually increased by three percent (3%), with fractional changes rounded to the nearest one cent (1¢). However, the comptroller of the treasury may, at the comptroller's discretion, reduce the amount required to be paid under this section when the work performed justifies the reduction.

Acts 1923, ch. 109, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 948a16; Code 1932, § 1660; Acts 1945, ch. 36, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1660; Acts 1953, ch. 59, § 1; modified; Acts 1968, ch. 585, § 1; 1976, ch. 786, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-311; Acts 1982, ch. 694, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §9-3-110; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8; 1989, ch. 494, § 1; 2008, ch. 762, § 1; 2016, ch. 1059, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

9-3-211. Annual audit in each political subdivision and special taxing district.

An annual audit of financial records and transactions covering each fiscal year shall be made of each department, office, agency, division or board which is charged with the care and control of public funds, in each political subdivision and special taxing district and which is not now required by law to be audited by the office of the comptroller of the treasury.

Such audit for each fiscal year shall be made and completed no later than the close of the succeeding year.

All audits performed by internal audit staffs of any such department, office, agency, division or board shall be conducted in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury, pursuant to § 4-3-304(9).

Acts 1961, ch. 233, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-313; Acts 1984, ch. 794, § 5; T.C.A., §9-3-111; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Eugene Puett), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1335.

9-3-212. Duty to order and pay for audits — Audit standards — Rules and regulations.

It is the duty of each political subdivision, special taxing district, board, commission, educational cooperative, intergovernmental cooperative or other governmental agency, including, but not limited to, municipal corporations, utility districts, school boards, and housing authorities created under the Housing Authorities Law, compiled in title 13, chapter 20, part 1, with respect to all funds under its control, to order and pay for such audit and for any other audit which it is required to perform under state law, and to contract with certified public accountants, public accountants, or the department of audit to make such audit.

The comptroller of the treasury, when the comptroller deems it necessary, may require any audit required of any such agency, or any investigative or review work in addition to such audit which, in the exercise of the comptroller's discretion, the comptroller believes necessary to ascertain or correct errors, irregularities, or defaults in the management and disbursement of funds controlled by such agency, to be conducted by the department of audit; provided, that the comptroller may also charge such agency for additional investigative or review work or additional accounting services which the comptroller may deem necessary.

Nothing herein shall amend or modify any requirement of a general or private act for an audit by a certified public accountant or public accountant. This section shall apply to political subdivisions, special taxing districts, boards, commissions, educational cooperatives, intergovernmental cooperatives, and any other governmental agency, including, but not limited to, municipal corporations, utility districts, school boards, and housing authorities created under the Housing Authorities Law, compiled in title 13, chapter 20, part 1, which are otherwise subject to financial audit by the state or federal government. In addition to the other requirements of this section, such agency shall furnish a copy of such audit report to the comptroller of the treasury.

The comptroller of the treasury, through the department of audit, shall be responsible for determining that such audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and that such audits meet the minimum standards prescribed by the comptroller. The comptroller of the treasury shall prepare a uniform audit manual as is required to assure that the books and records are kept in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and that the minimum audit standards prescribed by the comptroller are met.

Acts 1961, ch. 233, § 2; 1977, ch. 103, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 9-314, 9-3-112; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8; 1992, ch. 764, § 1; 2018, ch. 495, § 6.

9-3-213. Person or firm making audit to furnish copy to comptroller of the treasury.

Any person or firm making such audit shall furnish a certified copy of the audit report to the office of the comptroller of the treasury at the same time of submitting such report to the body that ordered the audit to be made.

Acts 1961, ch. 233, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 9-315, 9-3-113; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8.